Massachusetts, session 194th, S2588.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 111 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting after section 244 the following section:-
Section 245: Notwithstanding any special or general law to the contrary, the Board of
Registration in Medicine and the Center for Health Information and Analysis shall collect and
make publicly available data and information concerning the cultural, ethnic, linguistic, and
educational composition of the physician workforce for the purposes of assessing the impact of
physician workforce diversity and health outcomes in the Commonwealth of Massachusetts.
Health care facilities licensed under Section 51 of Chapter 111 of the Massachusetts
General Laws shall provide to both the Board of Registration in Medicine and the Center for
Health Information and Analysis, including but not limited to the following data on a yearly
basis for physicians, medical fellows, interns, and residents:
I. Demographic information, including but not limited to race, ethnicity, gender
identity, and sexual orientation
of 2

II. Linguistic information
III. Medical specialty/subspecialty
IV. Duration of practice in Massachusetts
V. Duration of practice at current facility
VI. Highest Professional Level / Leadership Appointment
VII. Highest Academic Appointment
VIII. Highest Educational Debt
IX. Employment status: Part-time / full-time / per diem
This data shall be aggregated and made publicly available on the Board of Registration in
Medicine website no more than 60 days after the end of each year.
SECTION 2. The Center for Health Information and Analysis shall report on the data
collected under this section to the Clerks of the House and Senate, the Joint Committee on Public
Health, and the Department of Public Health no later than February 28th of each calendar year.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective 90 days after enactment.
of 2